Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1209
Licensee; contract with debtor required; contents.

Each licensee shall make a written contract between himself and a debtor and immediately furnish the debtor with a true copy of the contract. The contract shall set forth the complete list of the debtor's obligations to be adjusted, a complete list of the creditors holding such obligations, the total charges agreed upon for the services of the licensee and the beginning and expiration date of the contract. No contract shall extend for a period longer than thirty-six months.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 9, p. 1182.